Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 6. Schedules, Charges, and Facilities

§ 3694.
Rebate on fare paid on train; penalty.

A railroad corporation and its agents or employees shall not demand or receive for a single ticket bought or fare paid, on a train or elsewhere than at its ticket office, more than ten cents in excess of the tariff rate charged at its ticket office. When such excess is received, the conductor or other person receiving it shall give to the passenger a certificate which shall entitle him or her to receive the excess so paid at any station of the corporation in exchange for such certificate, if presented for redemption at any time within 30 days from the day of issue. A person or corporation that violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00 for each offense.

§ 3695.
Equal charges and facilities; long and short haul.

A railroad corporation whose railroad is located in the State shall not charge a larger sum for the transportation of freight, merchandise, or passengers thereon for a less distance, to or from a way station on such road, than is charged for a greater distance. In case of a violation of this provision, the excess so charged may be recovered from such corporation, by the party aggrieved, in an action on this statute, with costs.

§ 3696.
Special rates; fairs and schools.

Railroad companies may transport at special and reduced rates, to and from a public agricultural exhibition or fair, animals or other property to be exhibited there publicly, and may transport at special and reduced rates, to and from schools and other institutions of learning in this State, students there attending, provided that such rates shall be available to all who exhibit at such exhibitions or fairs or attend such schools or other institutions of learning.

§ 3697.
Equal and reasonable facilities.

A person or corporation operating a railroad shall give to all persons reasonable and equal terms, benefits, facilities, and accommodations for the transportation of themselves, their agents and servants, and of merchandise and other property, upon such railroad, and for the use of the depots, buildings, and grounds thereof, and, at any point where such railroad connects with another railroad, reasonable and equal facilities of interchange.

§ 3698.
Connecting roads not to charge more for short than long distance; exception.

Two or more corporations whose roads connect shall not charge or receive for the transportation of freight to any station on the road of either of them a greater sum than is, at the time, charged or received for the transportation of the like class and quantity of freight from the same original point of departure to a station at a greater distance on the road of either in the same direction. This section shall not be construed as affecting the right of any railroad corporation to establish such rates on freights shipped over its line in carload lots from points outside the State to points beyond the State as may seem for its best interests, and the sum charged or received for the transportation of freight shall include all terminal charges.

§ 3699.
Penalty; excursion tickets.

A person or corporation violating a provision of sections 3697 and 3698 of this title shall be liable to the party aggrieved for all damages sustained by reason of such violation, in an action on this statute. However, such sections shall not be so construed as to prevent the issuing of excursion, mileage, and commutation tickets.

§ 3700.
Installation of telephone in stations.

Each railroad corporation doing business in this State shall grant to every person, firm, joint stock company, or corporation operating a public telephone line in the State and having at least 500 telephone connections, equal and reasonable terms, arrangements, and facilities for the installation of telephone instruments on the lines, or connected with the telephone system of such person, firm, joint stock company, or corporation, in all depots, station houses, or offices of such railroad corporation in the State. A railroad corporation that violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 and shall be further liable in an action on this statute, for damages to the party injured thereby.